Oklahoma, session 2026, SB697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.16, as
last amended by Section 140, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 427.16), is amended to read as follows:
Section 427.16. A. There is hereby created a medical marijuana
transporter license as a category of the medical marijuana business
license.
B. Pursuant to Section 424 of this title, the Oklahoma Medical
Marijuana Authority shall issue a medical marijuana transporter
license to licensed medical marijuana commercial growers, processors
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and dispensaries upon issuance of such licenses and upon each
renewal. Medical marijuana transporter licenses shall also be
issued to licensed medical marijuana research facilities, medical
marijuana education facilities and medical marijuana testing
laboratories upon issuance of such licenses and upon each renewal.
C. A medical marijuana transporter license may also be issued
to qualifying applicants who are registered with the Secretary of
State and otherwise meet the requirements for a medical marijuana
business license set forth in the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and
Patient Protection Act and the requirements set forth in this
section to provide logistics, distribution and storage of medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate and medical marijuana
products.
D. A medical marijuana transporter license shall be valid for
one (1) year and shall not be transferred with a change of
ownership. A licensed medical marijuana transporter shall be
responsible for all medical marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate
and medical marijuana products once the transporter takes control of
the product.
E. A transporter license shall be required for any person or
entity to transport or transfer medical marijuana, medical marijuana
concentrate or medical marijuana products from a licensed medical
marijuana business to another medical marijuana business, or from a

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

medi cal marijuana business to a medical marijuana research facility
or medical marijuana education facility.
F. A medical marijuana transporter licensee may contract with
multiple licensed medical marijuana businesses.
G. A medical marijuana transporter may maintain a licensed
premises to temporarily store medical marijuana, medical marijuana
concentrate and medical marijuana products and to use as a
centralized distribution point. A medical marijuana transporter may
store and distribute medical marijuana, medical marijuana
concentrate and medical marijuana products from the licensed
premises. The licensed premises shall meet all security
requirements applicable to a medical marijuana business. The
Authority shall issue licenses upon proper application by a licensee
and determination by the Authority that the proposed site and
facility are physically and technically suitable.
H. A medical marijuana transporter licensee shall use the seed-
to-sale tracking system developed pursuant to the Oklahoma Medical
Marijuana and Patient Protection Act to create shipping inventory
manifests documenting the transport or temporary storage of medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate and medical marijuana
products throughout the state.
I. A licensed medical marijuana transporter may maintain and
operate one or more warehouses in the state to handle medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate and medical marijuana
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prod ucts, provided they possess a valid, unexpired medical marijuana
transport license and have applied for and received a permit for
each warehouse location. The Authority shall issue an annual permit
for each warehouse location operated by a licensee that is equal to
the annual medical marijuana transport license term, and there shall
be no limit to the number of permits issued under a medical
marijuana transporter license. A permit shall be issued only upon
proper application by a licensee and determination by the Authority
that the proposed site and facility are physically and technically
suitable. Upon a finding that the proposed site and facility are
not physically or technically suitable, the Authority shall deny the
permit. Each warehouse location shall be registered approved and
inspected by the Authority prior to its use. Medical marijuana
transporter warehouses that are licensed and approved by the
Authority may temporarily store medical marijuana, medical marijuana
concentrate, and medical marijuana products, provided all temporary
storage is documented, tracked, and traceable.
J. With the exception of a lawful transfer between medical
marijuana businesses who are licensed to operate at the same
physical address, all medical marijuana, medical marijuana
concentrate and medical marijuana products shall be transported:
1. In vehicles equipped with Global Positioning System (GPS)
trackers;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. In a locked container and clearly labeled “Medical Marijuana
or Derivative”; and
3. In a secured area of the vehicle that is not accessible by
the driver during transit.
K. A transporter agent may possess marijuana at any location
while the transporter agent is transferring marijuana to or from a
licensed medical marijuana business, licensed medical marijuana
research facility or licensed medical marijuana education facility.
The Authority shall administer the provisions of this section and
the Authority, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous
Drugs Control, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, and the
Attorney General shall have the authority to enforce the provisions
of this section concerning transportation.
L. The Authority shall issue a transporter agent license to
individual agents, employees, officers or owners of a transporter
license in order for the individual to qualify to transport medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate or medical marijuana
products.
M. The annual fee for a transporter agent license shall be
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) and shall be paid by the transporter
license-holder or the individual applicant. Transporter agent
license reprints shall be Twenty Dollars ($20.00).
N. The Authority shall issue each transporter agent a registry
identification card within thirty (30) days of receipt of:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. The name, address and date of birth of the person;
2. Proof of current state residency;
3. Proof of identity as required for a medical marijuana
business license;
4. Possession of a valid state-issued driver license;
5. Verification of employment with a licensed transporter;
6. The application and affiliated fee; and
7. A copy of the criminal background check conducted by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, paid for by the applicant.
O. If the transporter agent application is denied, the
Authority shall notify the transporter in writing of the reason for
denying the registry identification card.
P. A registry identification card for a transporter shall
expire one (1) year after the date of issuance or upon notification
from the holder of the transporter license that the transporter
agent ceases to work as a transporter.
Q. The Authority may revoke the registry identification card of
a transporter agent who knowingly violates any provision of this
section, and the transporter is subject to any other penalties
established by law for the violation.
R. The Authority may revoke or suspend the transporter license
of a transporter that the Authority determines knowingly aided or
facilitated a violation of any provision of this section, and the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

lice nse holder is subject to any other penalties established in law
for the violation.
S. Vehicles used in the transport of medical marijuana or
medical marijuana product shall be:
1. Insured at or above the legal requirements in this state;
2. Capable of securing medical marijuana during transport; and
3. In possession of a shipping container as defined in Section
427.2 of this title capable of securing all transported products.
T. Prior to the transport of any medical marijuana, medical
marijuana concentrate or medical marijuana products, an inventory
manifest shall be prepared at the origination point of the medical
marijuana. The inventory manifest shall include the following
information:
1. For the origination point of the medical marijuana:
a. the licensee number for the commercial grower,
processor or dispensary,
b. address of origination of transport, and
c. name and contact information for the originating
licensee;
2. For temporary storage at a medical marijuana transporter
licensed premises or warehouse location that is licensed and
approved by the Authority:
a. the license number for the commercial grower,
processor, or dispensary,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. the address of origination of transport,
c. name and contact information for the originating
licensee, and
d. the license number, physical address, and name and
contact information of the medical marijuana
transporter licensed premises or warehouse location
and notation that the medical marijuana, medical
marijuana concentrates, and medical marijuana products
are being temporarily stored;
3. For the end recipient license holder of the medical
marijuana:
a. the license number for the dispensary, commercial
grower, processor, research facility or education
facility destination,
b. address of the destination, and
c. name and contact information for the destination
licensee;
3. 4. Quantities by weight or unit of each type of medical
marijuana product contained in transport;
4. 5. The date of the transport and the approximate time of
departure;
5. 6. The arrival date and estimated time of arrival;
6. 7. Printed names and signatures of the personnel
accompanying the transport; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. 8. Notation of the transporting licensee.
U. 1. A separate inventory manifest shall be prepared for each
licensee receiving the medical marijuana.
2. The transporter agent shall provide the other medical
marijuana business with a copy of the inventory manifest at the time
the product changes hands and after the other licensee prints his or
her name and signs the inventory manifest.
3. A receiving licensee shall refuse to accept any medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate or medical marijuana
products that are not accompanied by an inventory manifest.
4. Originating and receiving licensees, including medical
marijuana transporter warehouses temporarily storing medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate, and medical marijuana
products, shall maintain copies of inventory manifests and logs of
quantities of medical marijuana received for seven (7) years from
date of receipt.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 27, 2025 - DO PASS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB697 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)